Utah statutes.
13-42-107.    Application for registration -- Obligation to update
information.
An applicant or registered provider shall notify the administrator within ten
days after a change in the information specified in Subsection 13-42-105(2)(d)
or (f) or Subsection 13-42-106(1), (3), (6), (12), or (13).
